Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Enumerated Functions

7-3-301. Issuance of bonds.

Any metropolitan government created and established pursuant to chapters 1-3 of this title may issue bonds under such terms, conditions and limitations as may be prescribed by the metropolitan charter.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-3714; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 11.

Collateral References.

Limitation of municipal indebtedness as affected by combination or merger of two or more municipalities. 103 A.L.R. 154.

7-3-302. Public service districts.

Any metropolitan government created and established pursuant to chapters 1-3 of this title may at any time:

Assume and take over all public functions, rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of any utility district, sanitary district, school district or other public service district, all of whose public functions, services or duties are performed within the geographical jurisdiction of the metropolitan government, notwithstanding § 7-82-301, or any other statute; except, that if the metropolitan charter did not provide for the consolidation of the existing school systems, then the metropolitan government shall not have the power or authority to assume any public function, right, duty, property, asset or liability of any special school district that was not included in the consolidation of the local governments; and

Notify any utility district, sanitary district, school district or other public service district that performs some part of its public functions, services or duties within the geographical jurisdiction of such metropolitan government of its desire to assume responsibility for all or any part of such functions, services or duties. It shall then be the duty of such district and the metropolitan government to attempt to reach agreement in writing for the allocation to the metropolitan government of any such public functions, services or duties as the metropolitan government may desire to assume and all related rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of such district that justice and reason may require in the circumstances. Such metropolitan government, if and to the extent that it may choose, shall have the exclusive right to perform or provide municipal and utility functions and services within its geographic jurisdiction, notwithstanding § 7-82-301, or any other statute. Subject to such exclusive right, any such matters upon which the respective parties are not in agreement in writing within sixty (60) days after a metropolitan government gives such notice shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the laws of arbitration of the state of Tennessee effective at the time of submission to the arbitrators, except that § 29-5-101(2) shall not apply to any arbitration under this subdivision (2). The award so rendered shall be transmitted to the chancery court of the county in which the parties are situated, and then shall be subject to review in accordance with §§ 29-5-113, 29-5-115, and 29-5-118.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 14; T.C.A., § 6-3715; Acts 2009, ch. 371, § 2.

Cross-References. Utilities, cut-off procedure, title 65, ch. 32.

Attorney General Opinions. A metropolitan government may take over the functions and liabilities of any school district whose services are performed within the geographical jurisdiction of the government, OAG 01-17, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/6/01).

7-3-303. Alcoholic beverages.

The creation and establishment of a metropolitan government under chapters 1-3 of this title shall not alter the status of the county involved as to legality of the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages.

Local option elections previously held in the county pursuant to §§ 57-3-106 and 57-3-107 to fix such status shall continue to control until the status is subsequently altered by a local option election held pursuant to such law. Where a local option election under § 57-3-106 has previously permitted, or, subsequent to March 7, 1957, permits the sale of alcoholic beverages, then the urban services district, but not the general services district, shall be deemed a municipality within the meaning of the law.

The metropolitan council shall have the power and authority:

For the general services district, to regulate and tax the manufacture, distribution and sale of beer and other alcoholic beverages of less than five percent (5%) to the same extent that governing bodies of counties now possess, or may hereafter possess, such power and authority; and

For the urban services district, to regulate and tax the manufacture, distribution and sale of beer and other alcoholic beverages of less than five percent (5%) and also the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and possession of other alcoholic beverages to the same extent that governing bodies of cities now possess or may hereafter possess such power and authority.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 16; T.C.A., § 6-3717.

7-3-304. Zoning regulations.

The creation and establishment of a metropolitan government pursuant to chapters 1-3 of this title shall not alter or change zoning regulations effective in the county and in the city or cities consolidated, but the zoning regulations shall continue until modified or changed by the metropolitan council acting under authority granted in the charter of the metropolitan government.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 18; T.C.A., § 6-3718.

Cross-References. Local regulation of junkyards, §54-20-122.

7-3-305. Authority to order demolition of certain unoccupied buildings.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government with a population of less than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the governing body of any municipality that has a metropolitan form of government may authorize the demolition and removal of any unoccupied building or dwelling that is in such a state of disrepair that it constitutes a violation of one (1) or more municipal codes so as to render the building or dwelling unfit for human habitation, as determined by a court having jurisdiction of the case; provided, that the owner of any unoccupied building or dwelling has the right, within twelve (12) months of any final judicial determination adverse to such owner, to make such repairs as are necessary to bring the building or dwelling in compliance with the applicable codes of the municipality.

Acts 1979, ch. 372, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3763; Acts 1992, ch. 758, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-3-306. Competitive bidding.

Where the charter for a metropolitan government requires purchases in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) be made on the basis of competitive bidding, “competitive bidding” means:

Dollar amount of purchase: Requirement:

$1,000 to $3,999.99 Three (3) verbal, including telephone, quotations required

$4,000 to $9,999.99 Three (3) written, including faxed, quotations required

$10,000 and above Competitive sealed bids or request for proposals

Acts 1995, ch. 160, § 1.

7-3-307 — 7-3-310. [Reserved.]

Chapters 1-3 of this title shall have no effect upon the chancery courts, circuit courts and criminal courts established for or functioning in the county affected by a consolidation under chapters 1-3 of this title and it shall have no effect upon the judicial functions formerly exercised by the county judge.

The charter of a metropolitan government may provide that the powers and duties of the county mayor as accounting officer and as general agent of the county shall be exercised by such officer or agency of the metropolitan government and in such manner as the charter may provide.

Municipal courts created by the charters of the principal city and smaller cities may be provided for, consolidated or abolished by the charter for metropolitan government as courts of such cities; provided, however, that the term of office of an incumbent judge of a municipal court shall not be terminated or abridged by the charter for metropolitan government at the end of the term of any incumbent judge of a municipal court ending after the adoption of the charter for metropolitan government. The municipal judge shall in no manner hold such office for a further term except by the approval of a majority of the voters voting in an election to be held for such purpose or in the next regular election.

General sessions courts and juvenile courts established for the county shall be provided for and continued in the charter for metropolitan government as courts of the metropolitan government.

For all purposes contained within the charter for a metropolitan government, judges of the general sessions court shall likewise be judges of the metropolitan court and shall not engage in the private practice of law.

In counties where a general sessions court system exists prior to consolidation, the charter may consolidate municipal and general sessions courts by providing that judges of the municipal court of the principal city may become judges of the general sessions court, and that the general sessions court, in addition to the jurisdiction and powers previously vested in the general sessions court, shall also be vested with all the jurisdiction and powers vested in the municipal court of the principal city of the county prior to the creation of the metropolitan government, and jurisdiction to hear, try and dispose of all cases arising under the laws, ordinances and resolutions of the metropolitan government. It may also provide that jurisdiction and powers vested in the municipal courts of smaller cities that become a part of the urban services district at the time of the creation of a metropolitan government under chapters 1-3 of this title or that become a part of the metropolitan government later pursuant to § 7-1-106, shall be vested in the general sessions court, and that judges of such courts may become judges of the general sessions court. If the charter provides for consolidation of municipal and general sessions courts in such manner that municipal courts thus become general sessions courts and general sessions courts exercise all jurisdiction and powers previously exercised by municipal courts, then the charter may also provide that whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of judge of the general sessions court, it may be filled by appointment by the mayor of a judge to serve until the next general election occurring more than ninety (90) days after the occurrence of such vacancy. The charter may also provide that the metropolitan council may from time to time by ordinance increase the number of divisions of a general sessions court that has thus assumed the functions of municipal courts.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of less than thirty thousand (30,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the judge of the general sessions court shall be considered as a part-time judge, and shall not be prohibited from the practice of law or other gainful employment while serving as judge, except to the extent such practice or employment constitutes a conflict of interest.

The legislative body of any county that has adopted a metropolitan form of government may, by ordinance, create not more than two (2) additional divisions of general sessions court and not more than two (2) additional judges and other essential personnel to staff such divisions.

If the legislative body of such county creates such additional division or divisions, the judge or judges for the division or divisions shall be elected at the regular August election in 1998, and their term of eight (8) years shall begin on September 1, 1998.

If the legislative body desires the judge or judges of such new division or divisions to hear, primarily or exclusively, only certain types of cases, it shall so designate in the ordinance. Otherwise, such new division or divisions shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the other courts of general sessions in such counties.

The judge or judges of such new division or divisions shall have the same powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, as other general sessions judges in such county.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 19; 1969, ch. 298, § 1; 1971, ch. 9, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-3719; Acts 1989, ch. 457, § 1; 1993, ch. 324, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Judicial functions formerly exercised by the county judge, referred to in the first sentence, are now exercised by the court of general sessions by authority of Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Judges, municipal, minimum salary in municipalities of over 170,000 population, §6-56-151.

Time judge must devote to office, practice of law or other employment, §16-15-5002.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1978).

7-3-312. Certain state offenses enumerated — Exclusive jurisdiction in state courts — Restrictions on ordinances.

In all counties in this state that have adopted a metropolitan form of government, or that may subsequently adopt a metropolitan form of government, the offenses enumerated in subsection (b) are declared to be state offenses, and any person arrested for violation of the offenses shall be tried for violation of state law in state courts, in which the jurisdiction shall be exclusive. Any ordinance presently enacted to regulate any of the enumerated offenses or to be later enacted is hereby declared to be void and of no effect.

The enumerated offenses are as follows:

Driving while intoxicated or drugged, as forbidden by § 55-10-401;

Failing to stop after a traffic accident, as forbidden by title 55, chapter 10;

Driving while license is suspended or revoked, as forbidden by § 55-50-504; and

Drag racing, as defined and forbidden by § 55-10-501.

Acts 1967, ch. 265, § 1; 1967, ch. 389, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3725.

7-3-313. Airport noise mitigation programs.

Counties with metropolitan forms of government in which a metropolitan airport authority has been created pursuant to § 42-4-104 are hereby authorized to establish airport noise mitigation programs to minimize the impact of noise from airport operations on surrounding properties located within the area of the metropolitan government. Such airport noise mitigation programs may include sound insulation programs, purchase assistance programs, grant or loan programs or payment of compensation to property owners whose properties are adversely affected by airport noise. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the expenditure of public funds to implement such a noise mitigation program shall be for the public purpose of protecting the health, safety and welfare of the citizens of the metropolitan government.

No state funds shall be obligated or expended to implement this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 500, §§ 1, 3.

7-3-314. Financial assistance to nonprofit organizations.

The legislative body of each county with a metropolitan form of government may appropriate funds for the financial aid of any nonprofit organization as defined in § 6-54-111(a)(2), or any organization otherwise meeting the definition of “nonprofit civic organization” set forth in § 6-54-111(a)(2)(B), except that it is exempt from taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6)). Such appropriations shall be in accordance with the guidelines of the metropolitan government, which shall provide generally that any funds appropriated shall be used to promote the general welfare of the residents of the municipality.

Any nonprofit organization that desires financial assistance from a county with a metropolitan form of government shall file with the clerk of the legislative body a statement of the proposed use of the funds and the program that serves the residents of the county and a copy of an annual audit. The report will be open for public inspection during regular business hours of the clerk's office. This subsection (b) does not apply to nonprofit organizations involved in the study, participation in and appreciation of the visual, performing or literary arts receiving grants from an arts commission or arts board created by the legislative body of the metropolitan government.

Notwithstanding any state law or regulation to the contrary, where counties with a metropolitan form of government publish a budget document that includes the name of each nonprofit charitable or civic organization to which money is appropriated and the specific amount appropriated, and enter into a written agreement with any such organization, no additional resolutions approving such an appropriation shall be required. The clerk of the legislative body shall cause to be published, in a newspaper of general circulation, a list of all nonprofit charitable and civic organizations that are listed as receiving appropriations in the finally adopted budget ordinance.

Notwithstanding any state law or regulation to the contrary, where counties with a metropolitan form of government establish an arts commission or arts board and appropriate funds to that entity in the annual budget, that entity may distribute money to nonprofit organizations involved in the study, participation in and appreciation of the visual, performing, or literary arts without obtaining additional approval from the legislative body. The arts commission or arts board shall provide an annual report to the legislative body prior to the adoption of the annual budget detailing the grant recipients, the moneys disbursed, and the purpose for which the money was disbursed.

Upon the acquiring of real property pursuant to § 67-5-2507(a) or § 67-5-2508 by any county having a metropolitan form of government, and after the period of redemption has lapsed, the legislative body of the county having a metropolitan form of government may, by resolution, authorize the conveyance of the real property by grant to a nonprofit organization for the purpose of constructing affordable or workforce housing. The grant shall be in accordance with the regulations and guidelines of the county having a metropolitan form of government for the disposal of real property, which shall provide generally that any real property granted pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be used to construct affordable or workforce housing for residents of the county having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1995, ch. 121, § 1; 2015, ch. 410, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 410, § 3. May 8, 2015.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislation providing that a metropolitan government may issue bonds and notes under the Local Government Public Obligations Act must provide for a referendum. OAG 16-07, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (2/24/2016).

7-3-315. Additional services that may be provided by water or sewer authority.

A municipality-owned water or sewer utility, operating within the boundaries of a metropolitan government, may participate with a local housing authority to provide services, which may include leak repairs, payment of certain water and sewer charges caused by the leak, water or sewer connections, and service line replacements for eligible low and moderate income persons.

Acts 1998, ch. 775, § 1.

7-3-316.
Fees to be adjudged as part of costs — Disbursement of fees.

As provided in § 38-6-103, the following fees shall be adjudged as a part of the costs in each case upon conviction of the following offenses:

Controlled substances, narcotics, drugs $20.00

Driving a motor vehicle, or operating a boat while under the influence of intoxicants and/or drugs, except as provided in § 55-10-413(d) 17.50

Certification of criminal histories and records Amount fixed by the federal bureau of investigation

Upon the forfeiture of a cash bond or other surety entered as a result of a municipal traffic citation, whether considered a fine, a bond or a tax 13.75.

Such fees shall be in addition to and not in substitution for any and all fines and penalties otherwise provided for by law.

Except when and as provided in this section, the appropriate clerk, after deducting five percent (5%) as compensation when applicable, shall identify those fees set out in subsection (a) that are dedicated for use by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and remit the fees to the state treasury to be expended by the Tennessee bureau of investigation as appropriated by the general assembly. These fees shall be transmitted by the clerk of the court to the state treasurer for deposit in a fund to be used by the Tennessee bureau of investigation for the purpose of employing personnel; for the purchase of equipment and supplies; to pay for the education, training and scientific development of employees; or for any other purpose to allow the bureau’s business to be done in a more efficient and expeditious manner. The moneys received in the fund shall be invested for the benefit of the fund by the state treasurer pursuant to § 9-4-603. Amounts in the fund shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall, together with interest income credited to the fund, remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.

Upon approval of the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, local governing bodies which have the responsibility for providing funding for sheriffs' offices and police departments are authorized to purchase from state contracts approved for bureau purchases, scientific instruments designed to examine a person's breath and measure the alcohol content of a person's breath, for use as evidence in the trial of cases; provided, that prior to use of the scientific instruments, such instruments must be delivered to the forensic services division for testing and certification pursuant to § 38-6-103(g). The bureau shall continue to maintain and certify the instruments and operating personnel, pursuant to § 38-6-103(g), and furnish expert testimony in support of the use of the scientific instruments when required.

Acts 2012, ch. 1088, § 3; 2013, ch. 154, § 28.